Hawaii statutes.
§121-5 Command. The governor shall be
the commander in chief of the forces comprising the militia. The governor is
authorized to promulgate such rules, regulations, and forms therefor as are not
inconsistent with law, and to carry into full effect the law relative thereto.
The provisions of chapter 91 shall not apply. The rules, regulations, and
forms shall have the force of law. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-5; gen ch
1985]

Cross References

Governor, commander in chief under Hawaii const. art. V, §5.

President, commander in chief when militia called into actual
service of United States under U.S. Const. Art. II, §2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next